Illinois, session 104th, SB3901.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 105 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/105)  (from Ch. 40, par. 105)7    Sec. 105. Application of Civil Practice Law.) 8    (a) The provisions of the Civil Practice Law shall apply 9to all proceedings under this Act, except as otherwise 10provided in this Act.11    (b) A proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal 12separation or declaration of invalidity of marriage shall be 13entitled "In re the Marriage of ... and ...". A parental 14responsibility allocation or support proceeding shall be 15entitled "In re the (Parental Responsibility) (Support) of 16...".17    (c) The initial pleading in all proceedings under this Act 18shall be denominated a petition. A responsive pleading shall 19be denominated a response. If new matter by way of defense is 20pleaded in the response, a reply may be filed by the 21petitioner, but the failure to reply is not an admission of the 22legal sufficiency of the new matter. All other pleadings under 23this Act shall be denominated as provided in the Civil   SB3901- 2 -LRB104 19443 JRC 32891 b1Practice Law.2    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other law, the court must review 3evidence in proceedings under this Act under Supreme Court 4Rule 901 to evaluate whether the proposed evidence may have 5been generated by artificial intelligence as that term is 6defined in the Illinois Human Rights Act. 7    (d) As used in this Section, "pleadings" includes any 8petition or motion filed in the dissolution of marriage case 9which, if independently filed, would constitute a separate 10cause of action, including, but not limited to, actions for 11declaratory judgment, injunctive relief, and orders of 12protection. Actions under this subsection are subject to 13motions filed pursuant to Sections 2-615 and 2-619 of the Code 14of Civil Procedure. 15(Source: P.A. 99-90, eff. 1-1-16.)